en: Greek oils and fats
da: Græske olier og fedtstoffer
fr: Huiles et graisses grecques
hr: Grčka ulja i masti
lt: Aliejai ir riebalai iš Graikijos
sv: Grekiska oljor och fetter

en: Olive oils from Hungary, Hungarian olive oils
da: Olivenolier fra Ungarn, Ungarnske olivenolier
nl: Olijfolies uit Hongarije
sv: Olivoljor från Ungern, Ungerska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from Spain, Spanish olive oils
bg: Испанско дървено масло, испански зехтин
da: Olivenolier fra Spanien, Spanske olivenolier
de: Olivenöle aus Spanien
es: Aceites de oliva de España, Aceites de oliva españoles
fr: Huiles d'olive d'Espagne
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Španjolske
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Ispanijos
nl: Olijfoliën uit Spanje, Olijfolies uit Spanje, Spaanse olijfolies, Spaanse olijfoliën
sv: Olivoljor från Spanien, Spanska olivoljor

en: Extra-virgin olive oils from Spain, Spanish extra-virgin olive oils
da: Ekstra jomfruolivenolier fra Spanien, Spanske ekstra jomfruolivenolier
sv: Extra jungfruolivoljor från Spanien, Spanska extra jungfruolivoljor

en: Olive oils from La Alcarria
es: Aceite de La Alcarria
fr: Huile d'olive de La Alcarria
hr: Maslinova ulja iz la alcarrije
it: Olio di oliva de La Alcarria
nl: Olijfoliën uit La Alcarria, Olijfolies uit La Alcarria

en: Olive oils from Antequera
es: Aceite de Antequera
fr: Huile d'olive de Antequera
hr: Maslinova ulja iz antequere
it: Olio di oliva de Antequera
nl: Olijfoliën uit Antequera, Olijfolies uit Antequera

en: Olive oils from Baena
es: Aceite de Baena
fr: Huile d'olive de Baena
hr: Maslinova ulja iz baene
it: Olio di oliva de Baena
nl: Olijfoliën uit Baena, Olijfolies uit Baena

en: Olive oils from Baix Ebre-Montsià
ca: Oli del Baix Ebre-Montsià
es: Aceite del Baix Ebre-Montsià
fr: Huile d'olive de Baix Ebre-Montsià
hr: Maslinova ulja iz baix ebre-montsià
it: Olio di oliva de Baix Ebre-Montsià
nl: Olijfoliën uit Baix Ebre-Montsià, Olijfolies uit Baix Ebre-Montsià

en: Olive oils from Bajo Aragón
es: Aceite del Bajo Aragón
fr: Huile d'olive de Bajo Aragón
hr: Maslinova ulja iz bajo aragóna
it: Olio di oliva de Bajo Aragón
nl: Olijfoliën uit Bajo Aragón, Olijfolies uit Bajo Aragón

en: Olive oils from Campo de Calatrava
es: Aceite Campo de Calatrava
fr: Huile d'olive de Campo de Calatrava
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Campo de Calatrava
it: Olio di oliva de Campo de Calatrava
nl: Olijfoliën uit Campo de Calatrava, Olijfolies uit Campo de Calatrava

en: Olive oils from Campo de Montiel
es: Aceite Campo de Montiel
fr: Huile d'olive de Campo de Montiel
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Campo de Montiela
it: Olio di oliva de Campo de Montiel
nl: Olijfoliën uit Campo de Montiel, Olijfolies uit Campo de Montiel

en: Olive oils from Comunitat Valenciana
es: Aceite de la Comunitat Valenciana
fr: Huile d'olive de Comunitat Valenciana
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Comunitat Valenciana
it: Olio di oliva de Comunitat Valenciana
nl: Olijfoliën uit Comunitat Valenciana, Olijfolies uit Comunitat Valenciana

en: Olive oils from Empordà
ca: Oli de l'Empordà
es: Aceite de L'Empordà
fr: Huile d'olive de Empordà
hr: Maslinova ulja iz empordà
it: Olio di oliva de Empordà
nl: Olijfoliën uit Empordà, Olijfolies uit Empordà

en: Olive oils from Estepa
es: Aceite de Estepa
fr: Huile d'olive de Estepa
hr: Maslinova ulja iz estepe
it: Olio di oliva de Estepa
nl: Olijfoliën uit Estepa, Olijfolies uit Estepa

en: Olive oils from Gata-Hurdes
es: Aceite de Gata-Hurdes
fr: Huile d'olive de Gata-Hurdes
hr: Maslinova ulja iz gata-hurdesa
it: Olio di oliva de Gata-Hurdes
nl: Olijfoliën uit Gata-Hurdes, Olijfolies uit Gata-Hurdes

en: Olive oils from Ibiza
ca: Oli d´Eivissa
es: Aceite de Ibiza
fr: Huile d'olive de Ibiza
hr: Maslinova ulja s ibize
it: Olio di oliva de Ibiza
nl: Olijfoliën uit Ibiza, Olijfolies uit Ibiza

en: Olive oils from Jaén
es: Aceite de Jaén
fr: Huile d'olive de Jaén
hr: Maslinova ulja iz jaéna
it: Olio di oliva de Jaén
nl: Olijfoliën uit Jaén, Olijfolies uit Jaén

en: Olive oils from Les Garrigues
es: Aceite de Les Garrigues
fr: Huile d'olive de Les Garrigues
hr: Maslinova ulja iz les garrigues
it: Olio di oliva de Les Garrigues
nl: Olijfoliën uit Les Garrigues, Olijfolies uit Les Garrigues

en: Olive oils from Lucena
es: Aceite de Lucena
fr: Huile d'olive de Lucena
hr: Maslinova ulja iz lucene
it: Olio di oliva de Lucena
nl: Olijfoliën uit Lucena, Olijfolies uit Lucena

en: Olive oils from Mallorca
ca: Oli de Mallorca, Oli mallorquí
es: Aceite de Mallorca, Aceite mallorquín
fr: Huile d'olive de Mallorca
hr: Maslinova ulja s Mallorce
it: Olio di oliva de Mallorca
nl: Olijfoliën uit Mallorca, Olijfolies uit Mallorca